Nebraska, session 109, LB1050.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1050 LB1050
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 79-2601, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-2601 Sections 79-2601 to 79-2607 and section 5 of this act shall
be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Reading Improvement Act.
Sec. 2. Section 79-2602, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-2602 It is the intent of the Legislature that:
(1) School boards develop policies to facilitate reading instruction
and intervention services to address student reading needs, including,
but not limited to, dyslexia;
(2) All teachers for kindergarten through grade three should be
effective reading teachers as evidenced by (a) evaluations based on
classroom observations and student improvement on reading assessments or
(b) specialized training in reading improvement;
(3) Each student and his or her parents or guardians be informed of
the student's reading progress; and
(4) Each student in a public school be able to read at or above
grade level by third grade three.
Sec. 3. Section 79-2603, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-2603 (1) Each school district shall administer an approved
reading assessment three times during the school year to all students in
kindergarten through grade three, except for any student receiving
specialized instruction for limited English proficiency who has been
receiving such instruction for less than two years, any student receiving
special education services for whom such assessment would conflict with
the individualized education program plan, and any student receiving
services under a plan pursuant to the requirements of section 504 of the
federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. 794, or Title II of the
federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. 12131 to
12165, as such acts and sections existed on January 1, 2021, for whom
-2-

LB1050 LB1050
2026 2026
such assessment would conflict with such section 504 or Title II plan.
The first administration of such assessment for kindergarten students
shall occur within the first forty-five calendar days that school is in
session of each school year and for all other grades within the first
thirty calendar days that school is in session of each school year.
(2) For purposes of the Nebraska Reading Improvement Act, an
approved reading assessment means an assessment of student reading skills
approved by the State Department of Education which:
(a) Measures progress toward proficiency in the reading skills
assessed pursuant to subsection (5) of section 79-760.03 on the statewide
assessment of reading for grade three;
(b) Is valid and reliable;
(c) Is aligned with academic content standards for reading adopted
by either the State Board of Education pursuant to section 79-760.01 or
the school district administering such assessment pursuant to section
79-760.02;
(d) Allows teachers access to results in a reasonable time period as
established by the department, not to exceed fifteen contract days; and
(e) Is commercially available and complies with requirements
established by the department.
(3) On or before March 1, 2019, and on or before each March 1
thereafter, the department shall make public the list of approved reading
assessments for the subsequent school year and the threshold level of
performance for each such assessment to identify students who are able to
read at or above grade level. A student performing below the threshold
level shall be identified as having a reading deficiency for purposes of
the Nebraska Reading Improvement Act.
(4) On or before October 1, 2026, the department shall establish and
make public a threshold level of performance for the statewide assessment
of reading for grade three administered pursuant to subsection (5) of
section 79-760.03 and for each alternate assessment of reading for grade
-3-

LB1050 LB1050
2026 2026
three administered pursuant to subsection (11) of such section to
identify students who are able to read at or above grade level.
(5) On or before January 1, 2027, the department shall establish and
make public a test-based student portfolio option to demonstrate mastery
of grade three reading standard. The department shall set criteria for
the test-based student portfolio and a threshold level of performance to
identify students who are able to read at or above grade level.
(6) (4) Diagnostic assessments used within a supplemental reading
intervention program do not require department approval.
Sec. 4. Section 79-2604, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-2604 (1) Any student in kindergarten, grade one, grade two, or
grade three shall be identified as having a reading deficiency if such
student performs below the threshold level determined pursuant to
subsection (3) of section 79-2603 on an approved reading assessment. A
student who is identified as having a reading deficiency pursuant to this
subsection shall remain identified as having a reading deficiency until
the student performs at or above the threshold level on an approved
reading assessment.
(2) For purposes of retention pursuant to section 5 of this act, any
student identified as having a reading deficiency at the end of grade
three shall be identified as having a persistent reading deficiency
unless such student performs at or above (a) the threshold level
determined pursuant to subsection (4) of section 79-2603 on the statewide
assessment of reading for grade three or any alternate assessment of
reading for grade three or (b) the threshold level determined pursuant to
subsection (5) of section 79-2603 on a test-based student portfolio. Each
student identified as having a persistent reading deficiency pursuant to
this subsection shall remain identified as having a reading deficiency
until the student performs at or above the threshold level on an approved
reading assessment for grade three, the statewide assessment of reading
-4-

LB1050 LB1050
2026 2026
for grade three or any alternate assessment of reading for grade three,
or a test-based student portfolio.
(3) (2) Nothing in the Nebraska Reading Improvement Act shall
prohibit a school district from identifying any other student as having a
reading deficiency.
Sec. 5. (1) Beginning with the 2027-28 school year, except as
otherwise provided in this section, a school board shall not promote a
student identified as having a persistent reading deficiency to grade
four and shall retain such student in grade three.
(2) The provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall not apply
to:
(a) Any student who is exempt from the administration of an approved
reading assessment pursuant to subsection (1) of section 79-2603;
(b) Any student receiving special education services or services
under a plan pursuant to the requirements of section 504 of the federal
Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. 794, or Title II of the federal
Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. 12131 to 12165, as
such acts and sections existed on January 1, 2026, who has participated
in a supplemental reading intervention program pursuant to section
79-2605 for at least two school years and who was previously retained in
kindergarten, grade one, grade two, or grade three for at least one
school year; or
(c) Any student who has participated in a supplemental reading
intervention program pursuant to section 79-2605 for at least two school
years and who was previously retained in kindergarten, grade one, grade
two, or grade three for a cumulative total of two school years.
(3) No student shall be retained in grade three pursuant to this
section more than once.
Sec. 6. Section 79-2605, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-2605 (1) Each school district shall provide a supplemental
-5-

LB1050 LB1050
2026 2026
reading intervention program for the purpose of ensuring that students
can read at or above grade level at the end of third grade. School
districts may work collaboratively with a reading specialist at the State
Department of Education, with educational service units, with learning
communities, or through interlocal agreements to develop and provide such
supplemental reading intervention programs. Each supplemental reading
intervention program shall be:
(a) Provided to any student identified as having a reading
deficiency;
(b) Implemented during regular school hours in addition to regularly
scheduled reading instruction unless otherwise agreed to by a parent or
guardian; and
(c) Made available as a summer reading program between each school
year for any student who has been enrolled in grade one, grade two, or
grade three or in a higher grade and is identified as continuing to have
a reading deficiency at the conclusion of the school year preceding such
summer reading program. Such summer reading program may be (i) held in
conjunction with existing summer programs in the school district, (ii)
held in a community reading program not affiliated with the school
district, or (iii) offered online.
(2) The supplemental reading intervention program may also include:
(a) Reading intervention practices that are evidence-based;
(b) Diagnostic assessments to identify specific skill-based
strengths and weaknesses a student may have;
(c) Frequent monitoring of student progress throughout the school
year with instruction adjusted accordingly;
(d) Intensive intervention using strategies selected from the
following list to match the weaknesses identified in the diagnostic
assessment:
(i) Development in phonemic awareness, phonics, fluency, vocabulary,
and reading comprehension;
-6-

LB1050 LB1050
2026 2026
(ii) Explicit and systematic instruction with detailed explanations,
extensive opportunities for guided practice, and opportunities for error
corrections and feedback; or
(iii) Daily targeted individual or small-group reading intervention
based on student needs as determined by diagnostic assessment data
subject to planned extracurricular school activities;
(e) Strategies and resources to assist with reading skills at home,
including parent-training workshops and suggestions for parent-guided
home reading; or
(f) Access to before-school or after-school supplemental reading
intervention with a teacher or tutor who has specialized training in
reading intervention.
(3) Beginning with the 2027-28 school year, each school district
shall provide an intensive acceleration class for any student identified
as having a persistent reading deficiency and retained in grade three.
Each intensive acceleration class shall include:
(a) A reduced student-teacher ratio;
(b) Individualized instruction focused on the specific reading
deficiencies of the student;
(c) Reading intervention practices that are evidence-based;
(d) Diagnostic assessments to identify specific skill-based
strengths and weaknesses a student may have;
(e) Frequent monitoring of student progress throughout the school
year with instruction adjusted accordingly;
(f) Intensive intervention using strategies selected from the
following list to match the weaknesses identified in the diagnostic
assessment:
(i) Development in phonemic awareness, phonics, fluency, vocabulary,
and reading comprehension;
(ii) Explicit and systematic instruction with detailed explanations,
extensive opportunities for guided practice, and opportunities for error
-7-

LB1050 LB1050
2026 2026
corrections and feedback; or
(iii) Daily targeted individual or small-group reading intervention
based on student needs as determined by diagnostic assessment data
subject to planned extracurricular school activities;
(g) Strategies and resources to assist with reading skills at home,
including parent-training workshops and suggestions for parent-guided
home reading;
(h) The option of a transitional instructional setting designed to
produce learning gains sufficient to meet grade four performance
standards in all other core academic areas while continuing to correct
areas of reading deficiency; and
(i) Access to before-school or after-school supplemental reading
intervention with a teacher or tutor who has specialized training in
reading intervention.
Sec. 7. Section 79-2606, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-2606 (1) The school of any student who is identified as having a
reading deficiency shall notify such student's parents or guardians
either in writing or by electronic communication no later than fifteen
working days after the identification of the reading deficiency that the
student has been identified as having a reading deficiency and that an
individualized reading improvement plan will be established and shared
with the parents or guardians.
(2) Any student who is identified as having a reading deficiency
shall receive an individualized reading improvement plan, which shall
include a supplemental reading intervention program, no later than thirty
days after the identification of such reading deficiency. The reading
improvement plan may be created by the teacher, the principal, other
pertinent school personnel, and the parents or guardians of the student
and shall describe the reading intervention services the student will
receive through the supplemental reading intervention program pursuant to
-8-

LB1050 LB1050
2026 2026
section 79-2605 to remedy such reading deficiency. Each such student
shall receive reading intervention services through the supplemental
reading intervention program pursuant to section 79-2605 until the
student is no longer identified as having a reading deficiency.
(3) Beginning with the 2027-28 school year, the school of any
student in grade three who remains identified as having a reading
deficiency as of January 1 of the current school year shall notify such
student's parents or guardians either in writing or by electronic
communication on or before February 1 of such school year that if the
student continues to be identified as having a reading deficiency at the
end of grade three and does not meet any of the threshold levels
established pursuant to section 79-2603, the student will be identified
as having a persistent reading deficiency and will be retained for the
following school year in grade three. The notice shall offer an
opportunity for the parents or guardians to meet and discuss possible
changes to the student's individualized reading improvement plan with the
teacher, the principal, or other pertinent school personnel.
Sec. 8. Section 79-2607, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-2607 (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Evidence-based reading instruction means instruction in reading
that is in alignment with scientifically based reading research and does
not include the three-cueing system model of reading instruction; and
(b) Three-cueing system model of reading instruction is an approach
to foundational skills instruction that involves the use of three
different types of instructional cues which include semantic, syntactic,
and graphophonic.
(2)(a) The State Department of Education shall develop and implement
a professional learning system to help provide sustained professional
learning and training regarding evidence-based reading instruction for
teachers who teach children from four years of age through third grade at
-9-

LB1050 LB1050
2026 2026
an approved or accredited school and teachers employed by an early
childhood education program approved by the State Board of Education. The
professional learning system shall include information and tips for
teachers related to helping children and families work with local family
literacy centers to strengthen home and family literacy programs and
better instruct children in reading.
(b) Approved or accredited elementary schools and early childhood
education programs approved by the State Board of Education shall ensure
that teachers who teach children from four years of age through third
grade are aware of the professional learning system and are adequately
trained regarding evidence-based reading instruction to effectively
instruct students in reading.
(3) The State Department of Education shall work with educational
service units to provide regional coaches to approved or accredited
elementary schools to provide assistance and job-embedded training
relating to evidence-based reading instruction to teachers who teach
students in kindergarten through third grade.
(4) On or before September 30 of each year, the Commissioner of
Education shall file a report electronically with the Clerk of the
Legislature relating to the status and use of the professional learning
system implemented pursuant to this section.
(5) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate two million
dollars from the Education Future Fund for each fiscal year beginning
with fiscal year 2024-25 through fiscal year 2026-27 to the State
Department of Education to provide regional coaches and job-embedded
training relating to evidence-based reading instruction pursuant to
subsection (2) or (3) of this section.
(6) The State Department of Education shall may provide technical
assistance as needed to assist school boards in carrying out the Nebraska
Reading Improvement Act.
(7) The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
-10-

LB1050 LB1050
2026 2026
carry out the act.
Sec. 9. Original sections 79-2601, 79-2602, 79-2603, 79-2604,
79-2605, 79-2606, and 79-2607, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are
repealed.
-11-